Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS chapter
476.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “actual cost” means:
(a) Any costs incurred by the State Fire  Marshal in controlling or extinguishing a fire
under this chapter, including under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; and
(b) Any payments made by  the State Fire Marshal as reimbursement for controlling or
extinguishing the fire.
(2) If a person is willful, malicious or negligent in the origin or  subsequent spread of a
fire:
(a) The State Fire  Marshal shall mail to the person a written demand for payment of the
actual cost of the fire; and
(b) The person shall pay the actual cost of the fire to  the State Fire Marshal not more
than 90 days after the written demand for payment is mailed.
(3) If  the person does not pay the actual cost of the fire as described in subsection (2)
of this section:
(a) The amount of the actual cost  of the fire shall bear interest at 10 percent per year
from the date on which the  first written demand for the payment of the actual cost of the
fire was mailed by the State Fire Marshal; and
(b) The actual cost of the fire and any interest may be recovered from the person  by an
action prosecuted in the name of the State of Oregon.
(4) The actual cost of  the fire may, at the discretion of the State Fire Marshal, constitute
a general lien upon the real and personal property of the person.
(5) A written notice of  a lien described in subsection (4) of this section, containing a de-
scription of the property and a statement of the actual cost of the fire:
(a) Must be  certified under oath by the State Fire Marshal and filed in the office of the
county clerk  of the county in which the property is situated within 12 months after the cal-
endar year within which the fire originated; and
(b) May be foreclosed in the manner provided by law  for foreclosure of liens for labor and
material.
Enrolled Senate Bill 863 (SB 863-A) Page 1
(6) A lien created under this section shall cease to exist unless suit  for foreclosure is
instituted within 12 months from the date of filing of the written  notice of the lien under
subsection (5) of this section.
(7) In any proceeding to foreclose a lien created under this  section, recovery for the
plaintiff shall include, in addition to the amount of the actual cost, interest  on such amount
at the rate of 10  percent per year from the date of the filing of the written notice of the lien
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) Upon request  of the State Fire Marshal, the Attorney General shall prosecute an
action under this section to recover the  actual cost of the fire or foreclose a lien, in the
name of the State of Oregon.
(9) In an action under  this section to recover the actual cost of a fire or foreclose a lien,
the court shall:
(a) Accept an itemized statement of the actual cost  of the fire, certified by the State Fire
Marshal, as prima facie evidence of the actual cost of the fire; and
(b) At trial and on appeal, award reasonable attorney fees,  in addition to costs and dis-
bursements, to the prevailing party.
SECTION 3. (1) At the request of the State  Fire Marshal, for the purpose of investigating
liability for the actual cost, as defined in section 2 of  this 2025 Act, of a fire, the Attorney
General may administer oaths and affirmations,  take testimony or depositions and by
subpoena compel:
(a) The attendance of witnesses;
(b) The production of documents, including but not limited to writings, drawings, graphs,
charts, photographs and other data compilations from which information can be obtained and
translated; and
(c) The production of any other tangible  thing that the Attorney General deems relevant
or material to the investigation.
(2) Each witness subpoenaed under subsection (1) of this section  shall receive the fees
and mileage provided in ORS 44.415 (2).
(3) If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under  this section, or if a party
or witness  refuses to testify on any matter under this section, the State Fire Marshal may
petition the circuit court of any county  to order the person to show cause why the person
has failed to comply with the subpoena and should not be held in contempt.
(4) If the State Fire Marshal petitions a circuit court as  described in subsection (3) of
this section, the State Fire Marshal shall serve the person  with the document initiating the
contempt action as described in ORS 33.055 (5)(a).
(5) If the State Fire Marshal petitions a circuit court as  described in subsection (3) of
this section and the person does not  show good cause why the person has failed to comply
with the subpoena, the  circuit court shall compel obedience with the subpoena by pro-
ceedings for contempt.
SECTION 4.
Under instructions from the State Fire Marshal as to the exercise of  state
authority, for the purpose of preserving evidence and investigating  liability for the actual
cost, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act, of a fire, a deputy state fire marshal may:
(1) Secure the fire origin area at any time; and
(2) Control, restrict or prohibit access to the fire origin area by unauthorized  persons
as long as is reasonably necessary, in the judgment of the deputy state fire marshal.
Enrolled Senate Bill 863 (SB 863-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 863 (SB 863-A) Page 3